Utah statutes.
53A-19-201.   Control of school lunch revenues -- Apportionment -- Costs.

(1)  School lunch revenues shall be under the control of the State Board of Education and may only be disbursed, transferred, or drawn upon by its order.  The revenue may only be used to provide school lunches and a school lunch program in the state's school districts in accordance with standards established by the board.

(2)  The board shall apportion the revenue according to the number of school children receiving school lunches in each school district.  The State Board of Education and local school boards shall employ staff to administer and supervise the school lunch program and purchase supplies and equipment.

(3)  The costs of the school lunch program shall be included in the state board's annual budget.



Enacted by Chapter 2, 1988 General Session

